Alaska, session 34, SB98.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 08.03.010(c)(22) is amended to read: 05 (22) Board of Veterinary Examiners (AS 08.98.010) - June 30, 2031 06 [2025]. 07 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 08 read: 09 RETROACTIVITY. This Act is retroactive to June 30, 2025. 10 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.